src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software ; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     South Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ================================
!! !!!Nominal inflection sublexica
! ================================

!! !!Inflection for odd-syllable nouns


LEXICON N_ODD
 +N: N_ODD_INFL ;

LEXICON N_ODD_INFL
!! The basic odd-syll lexicon is: @LEXNAME@

!! !Inflection for odd-syllable nouns: lexicon @LEXNAME@
!  -----------------------------------------------------
!
!! Short descrioption of this lexicon, and its purpose.
!
               +Sg:             N_ODD_SG       ;
               +Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                                N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gierehtse # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gierehtse:           gierehtse+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gierehtsen:          gierehtse+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ gieriehtsasse:       gierehtse+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ gieriehtsisnie:      gierehtse+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ gieriehtsistie:      gierehtse+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Sg+Com
!!€ gierehtsh:           gierehtse+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ gieriehtsidie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ gierehtsi:           gierehtse+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ gieriehtsidie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ gieriehtsijstie:     gierehtse+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ gierehtsigujmie:     gierehtse+N+Pl+Com
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Ess
!!€ gierehtsem:          gierehtse+N+Sg+Acc


LEXICON N_ODD_LOAN
!! * Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon @LEXNAME@
         +N+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>amme    FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>adth    FINAL1    ;
         +N+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:%>amth    FINAL1    ;
         +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>anne    FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>anne    FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>anne    FINAL1    ;
         +N+Sg+Ill:%>asse    FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh  FINAL1    ;
         +N+Sg+Ine:%>isnie   FINAL1    ;
         +N+Sg+Ela:%>istie   FINAL1    ;
 +N+Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:%>istie   FINAL1    ; !Miesie Mavve
         +N+Sg+Com:%>inie    FINAL1    ;
   +N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh  FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Acc:%>idie    FINAL1    ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>idie    FINAL1    ; !Miesie Mavve
         +N+Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1    ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ij      FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Ill:%>idie    FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Ine:%>inie    FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie  FINAL1    ;
         +N+Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1    ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie FINAL1    ;
                +N:          N_ODD_ESS ;
       +N+Cmp/SgNom:e         R         ;
       +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>n      R         ;
       +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i       R         ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG
!! ** Odd-syll sg: lexicon @LEXNAME@
!  +Nom:e         FINAL1 ; ! sjekk
         +Nom:e%^DISIMP       FINAL1 ;
   +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme          FINAL1 ;
   +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth          FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm    FINAL1 ;
   +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth          FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn    FINAL1 ;
   +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne          FINAL1 ;
   +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne          FINAL1 ;
   +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne          FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>asse          FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh        FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>isnie         FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>istie         FINAL1 ;
 +Ela+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPistie FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
         +Com:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
   +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh        FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL
!! ** Odd-syll pl: lexicon @LEXNAME@
         +Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPidie    FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
 +Acc+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPide     FINAL1 ; 
         +Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPij      FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Ill+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPide     FINAL1 ;       
         +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
        
         +Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_ESS
!! ** Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon @LEXNAME@
 +Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅABPETJH ! Resiproke og dim.
!! ** Default N_ODD plural lexicon: lexicon @LEXNAME@
                    +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMP        IGENSUFF  ;
                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1    ;
            +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1   ;
                       +N+Ess:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP         R        ;
                  +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi       R        ;
       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%»adtj            NIEJTE_PL ;
          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj            EVEN_ESS  ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»adtje           R        ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i         R        ;
 
 
!! LEXICON TJE_LASSJE_RESIPR

!        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%»adtj            NIEJTE_PL ;
!           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj            EVEN_ESS  ;
!  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»adtje           R         ;
!  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i         R         ;


LEXICON TJE_ETJE_RESIPR

       +N+Pl:%»edtj            NIEJTE_PL ;
       +N+Pl:%»edtj            EVEN_ESS  ;
       +N+Cmp/SgNom:edtje          R         ;
!  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%»adtj%>i         R         ;




LEXICON N_ODD_C   !these words have consonant-ending in nominative
           +N+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP     FINAL1         ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1         ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1         ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1         ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
           +N+Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1         ;
           +N+Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1         ;
           +N+Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Nom+PxSg1:%>amme       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Nom+PxSg2:%>adth       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Acc+PxSg2:%>amth       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Gen+PxSg1:%>anne       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Gen+PxSg2:%>anne       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Gen+PxSg3:%>anne       FINAL1         ;
        +N+Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh     FINAL1         ;
        +N+Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh     FINAL1         ;
               +N+Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  +N:             N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMP     R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
