src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
aaltehke+Sem/Dummytag:aaltehk N_ODD ;
biejjietjoevkese:biejjietjoevkes N_ODD ;
bastese+Sem/Dummytag:bastes N_ODD ;
soelmehth+Sem/Dummytag:soelmehth N_ODD_C ; 
moenjehth+Sem/Dummytag:moenjehth N_ODD_C ; 
mineralboejhkehts+Sem/Dummytag:mineral#boejhkehts N_ODD_C ; 
dååjvehts+Sem/Dummytag:dååjvehts N_ODD_C ; 
vaastehts+Sem/Dummytag:vaastehts N_ODD_C ; 
tjåamohts+Sem/Dummytag:tjåamohts N_ODD_C ; 
boerese+Sem/Dummytag:boeres N_ODD ;
aajmehth+Sem/Dummytag:aajmehth N_ODD_C ; 
habpehth+Sem/Dummytag:habpehth N_ODD_C ; 
bååhpere+Sem/Dummytag:bååhper N_ODD ;
daeverh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:daevier ÅABPETJH ;
debijtore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:debitor N_ODD_LOAN ;
deerpegh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:deerpeg ÅABPETJH ;
desimeetere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:desimeeter N_ODD ;
doedtebeetnegh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:doedte#beetneg ÅABPETJH ;
dåarohtje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:dåaroehtj N_ODD ;
dååjrehts+Sem/Dummytag:dååjrehts N_ODD_C ;
eejhtegh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:eejhteg ÅABPETJH ;
egyptere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:egypter N_ODD_LOAN ;
eksempele+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:eksempel N_ODD_LOAN ;
eldiedtese+Sem/Dummytag:el#diedtes N_ODD ;
etnose+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:etnos N_ODD_LOAN ;
naalegh+Sem/Dummytag:naaleg ÅABPETJH ; 
föörhkelh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:föörhkel ÅABPETJH ;
gïeles+Sem/Dummytag:gïeles N_ODD_C ;
gearketje+Sem/Dummytag:gearkatj N_ODD ;
giesiedalhketjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:giesie#dalhketj ÅABPETJH ;
godterh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:godter ÅABPETJH ;
gossehth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gosseht ÅABPETJH ;
åenehts+Sem/Dummytag:åenehts N_ODD_C ; !forkorting
gåaromedeerpegh+Sem/Dummytag:gåarome#deerpeg ÅABPETJH ;
voetjes+Sem/Dummytag:voetjes N_ODD_C ;
gïhpetje+Sem/Dummytag:gïhpetj N_ODD ;
gïjrevïelkedh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gïjre#vïelked ÅABPETJH "vårmat" ;
hamburgere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hamburger N_ODD_LOAN ;
jyjseme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:jyjsem N_ODD ;
kaasuse+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kasus N_ODD_LOAN ;
kapsele+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kapsel N_ODD_LOAN ;
kredijtore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kreditor N_ODD_LOAN ;
kalendere+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kaleender N_ODD_LOAN ;
laemehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:laemiehk N_ODD ;
maadtere+Sem/Dummytag:maadter N_ODD_LOAN ;
mojhtes+Sem/Dummytag:mojhtes N_ODD_C ;
monegaskere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:monegasker N_ODD_LOAN ;
mååktege+Sem/Dummytag:mååkteg N_ODD ; !adj
nïmmerh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:nïmmer ÅABPETJH ;
orkestere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:orkester N_ODD_LOAN ;
ossjelammes+Sem/Dummytag:ossjelammes N_ODD_C ;
pariserjårrese+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pariser#jårres N_ODD ;
planktone+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:plankton N_ODD_LOAN ;
preussere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:preusser N_ODD_LOAN ;
pæhperh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:pæhpar ÅABPETJH ;
saabate+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:saabat N_ODD_LOAN ;
saadthalmetje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:saadth#almetj N_ODD ;
science-fiction+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sci^ence-fiction N_ODD_C ;
sjangere+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sjaanger N_ODD_LOAN ;
slïehtehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:slïehtehk N_ODD ;
böötegh+Sem/Dummytag:bööteg ÅABPETJH ;
tjovregh+Sem/Dummytag:tjovreg ÅABPETJH ;
lohtegh+Sem/Dummytag:lohteg ÅABPETJH ;
sysnetjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sysnetj ÅABPETJH ;
telefovnenummere+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:telefovne#nummer N_ODD_LOAN ;
tjantsehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjantsehk N_ODD ;
tjidtjetjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjidtjetj ÅABPETJH ;
tjïjhtjehts+Sem/Dummytag:tjïjhtjehts N_ODD_C ;
vaarrege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vaarreg N_ODD ;
åabpetjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:åabpetj ÅABPETJH ;
åktsehts+Sem/Dummytag:åktsahts N_ODD_C ;
gåangkalommes+Sem/Dummytag:gåangkalommes N_ODD_C ;
åvtesgaamese+Sem/Dummytag:åvtes#gaames N_ODD ;
adjunkte+Sem/Dummytag:adjunkt N_ODD_LOAN ;
